Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3180.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 123B.02, subdivision 25, is amended to read: Subd. 25. School resource officers. new text begin (a) new text end A board that contracts for the services of a school resource officer must ensure the contract meets the requirements of section 626.8482. new text begin (b) A board must submit an annual report to the commissioner of education, in the form and manner determined by the commissioner, that contains the following information about a contract for the services of a school resource officer: new text end new text begin (1) the law enforcement agency that provides the school resource officer; new text end new text begin (2) the start and end date of the contract; new text end new text begin (3) the number of school resource officers contracted for; and new text end new text begin (4) the school sites school resource officers are assigned to. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end